District of Columbia statutes.
38-213

Court jurisdiction.

The Family Division of the Superior Court is hereby given jurisdiction in all cases arising under this subchapter.

History

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 808, ch. 140, Art. III, § 3
May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 26
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I,§ 159(g)

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 38-209.
1981 Ed., § 31-413.
1973 Ed., § 31-213.